Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-402
Children; when deemed legitimate.

Whenever any man and woman, either of whom is whole or in part of Indian blood, shall have cohabited together as husband and wife according to the customs and manners of Indian life, the issue of such cohabitation shall be taken and deemed to be the legitimate issue of such persons so living together, notwithstanding the fact that the father and mother may have been divorced or separated according to Indian customs, or otherwise, and married to other persons, according to Indian custom, or otherwise.

Laws 1913, c. 68, § 2, p. 201;

R.S.1913, § 1608;

C.S.1922, § 1557;

C.S.1929, § 42-402;

R.S.1943, § 42-402.